New Jersey, session 221, S1508.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer who has a gross income of $150,000 or less during the taxable year and who has paid one-half or more of the costs of tuition of a dependent under the age of 22 years who is a resident of this State and a full-time student in good standing at a New Jersey four-year institution of higher education, a New Jersey county college, or an accredited post-secondary business, technical, trade or vocational school in this State, shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 10% of the cost of tuition, paid by the taxpayer during the taxable year, up to a maximum credit of $1,000.  A credit shall not be allowed under this subsection for a taxable year if the taxpayer has claimed a deduction for the dependent pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1976, c.84 (C.54A:3-1.1) for that taxable year. b.    A resident taxpayer who has a gross income of $150,000 or less during the taxable year and who has paid the costs of tuition for the taxpayer's full-time attendance in good standing at a New Jersey four-year institution of higher education, a New Jersey county college, or an accredited post-secondary business, technical, trade or vocational school in this State, shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 10% of the cost of tuition, paid by the taxpayer during the taxable year, up to a maximum credit of $1,000.  A credit shall not be allowed under this subsection for a taxable year if the taxpayer is a dependent of another taxpayer who claims a credit for the taxpayers costs of tuition under subsection a. of this section for that taxable year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.